New York, session 2025-2026, A8035.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 6-i of section 3602 of the education law, as 2 added by section 6 of part A of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, is 3 amended and a new subdivision 6-j is added to read as follows: 4 6-i. Building aid and the New York state energy research and develop- 5 ment authority P-12 schools: clean green schools initiative. 1. For aid 6 payable in the school years two thousand twenty-two--two thousand twen- 7 ty-three and thereafter, notwithstanding any provision of law to the 8 contrary, the apportionment to any district under subdivision six, 9 six-a, six-b, six-c, six-e, six-f, [or] six-h, or six-j of this section 10 for capital outlays for school building projects for energy efficiency 11 shall not exclude grants authorized pursuant to the New York state ener- 12 gy research and development authority P-12 schools: clean green schools 13 initiative from aidable expenditures, provided that the sum of appor- 14 tionments for these projects calculated pursuant to subdivision six, 15 six-a, six-b, six-c, six-e, six-f, [or] six-h, or six-j of this section 16 and such grants shall not exceed the actual project expenditures. 17 2. The New York state energy research and development authority shall 18 provide a list of energy efficiency grants awarded to each school 19 district to the commissioner no later than one month prior to the end of 20 each calendar year and each school year. This list shall include the 21 capital construction project or projects funded by the grants, the award 22 amounts of each individual project grant, the district receiving such 23 grants, the schools receiving such grants, the date on which the grant 24 was received, and any other information necessary for the calculation of EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10380-01-5 A. 8035 2 1 aid pursuant to subdivision six, six-a, six-b, six-c, six-e, six-f, [or] 2 six-h, or six-j of this section. 3 6-j. Building aid for incremental zero-emission school bus infrastruc- 4 ture costs. a. For the purposes of this subdivision, the following terms 5 shall have the following meanings: 1. "incremental zero-emission school 6 bus storage costs" shall mean the sum of additional costs for the stor- 7 age of zero-emission school buses as compared to traditional school 8 buses. Such incremental costs shall reflect new or increased costs from, 9 but not be limited to: modifications to bus facilities such as wider and 10 taller doors and/or garages, modifications to bus facilities to address 11 higher weights such as higher power lifts, equipment and software for 12 advanced fire suppression systems, installation and operation of charge 13 management systems, and the cost of entire storage facilities or prepa- 14 ration of storage locations where one would not have been necessary but 15 for the storage of zero-emission school buses; and 16 2. "incremental customer-owned make-ready costs" shall mean the sum of 17 additional costs of any capital investment in equipment or infrastruc- 18 ture beyond the utility service point necessary to make a site ready to 19 accept an electric vehicle charger, including conductors, trenching, and 20 panels, where such costs would not have been present but for the prepa- 21 ration of the site to be able to charge zero-emission school buses. 22 b. In addition to the apportionments payable to a school district 23 pursuant to subdivision six of this section, the commissioner is hereby 24 authorized to apportion to any school district additional building aid 25 pursuant to this subdivision for its approved expenditures, otherwise 26 ineligible for building aid, beginning in the base year through the two 27 thousand thirty-four--two thousand thirty-five school year for incre- 28 mental zero-emission school bus storage costs and incremental customer- 29 owned make-ready costs that are constructed or improved pursuant to this 30 subdivision, provided that such expenditures are not reimbursable from 31 another state or federal source except as provided in subdivision six-i 32 of this section, or from funding from one or more electric corporations 33 as such term is defined in section two of the public service law. Such 34 aid shall equal the actual approved expenditures incurred beginning in 35 the base year through the two thousand thirty-four--two thousand thir- 36 ty-five school year pursuant to this subdivision, to the extent that 37 such expenditures are not reimbursable from another state or federal 38 source except as provided in subdivision six-i of this section, or from 39 funding from one or more electric corporations as such term is defined 40 in section two of the public service law. 41 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately